Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-2752
Foreign adversary person; forms and instructions; director; duties.

Within thirty days after July 18, 2026, the director shall prescribe forms and instructions and issue an order governing applications under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act to require information sufficient to show that the applicant is not a foreign adversary person.

Laws 2026, LB838, § 8.
July 18, 2026